North Carolina statutes. Constitution of North Carolina
Article XII Military Forces

§ 1. Governor is Commander in Chief.

The Governor shall be Commander in Chief of the military forces of the State and may call out those forces to execute the law, suppress riots and insurrections, and repel invasion.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. XII, § 3, Const. 1868.